test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-even-u-loan_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - laŋkku: # u-stems
    laŋkku+N+Sg+Nom: laŋkku
    laŋkku+N+Sg+Gen: laaŋku
    laŋkku+N+Sg+Acc: laaŋku
    laŋkku+N+Sg+Ill: laaŋkun
    laŋkku+N+Sg+Loc: laaŋkust
    laŋkku+N+Sg+Com: laŋkkuin
    laŋkku+N+Pl+Abe: laŋkuttáá
    laŋkku+N+Ess:    laŋkkun
    laŋkku+N+Par:    laŋkkud
    laŋkku+N+Pl+Nom: laaŋkuh
    laŋkku+N+Pl+Gen: laaŋkui
    laŋkku+N+Pl+Acc: laaŋkuid
    laŋkku+N+Pl+Ill: laŋkkuid
    laŋkku+N+Pl+Loc: laaŋkuin
    laŋkku+N+Pl+Com: laŋkuiguin
    laŋkku+N+Pl+Abe: laŋkuittáá

  Noun - láávu: # u-stems
    láávu+N+Sg+Nom: láávu
    láávu+N+Sg+Gen: láávu
    láávu+N+Sg+Acc: láávu
    láávu+N+Sg+Ill: láávun
    láávu+N+Sg+Loc: láávust
    láávu+N+Sg+Com: láávoin
    láávu+N+Pl+Abe: lávuttáá
    láávu+N+Ess:    láávvun
    láávu+N+Par:    láávvud
    láávu+N+Pl+Nom: láávuh
    láávu+N+Pl+Gen: láávui
    láávu+N+Pl+Acc: láávuid
    láávu+N+Pl+Ill: láávoid
    láávu+N+Pl+Loc: láávuin
    láávu+N+Pl+Com: lávuiguin
    láávu+N+Pl+Abe: lávuittáá

  Noun - lippu: # u-stems
    lippu+N+Sg+Nom: lippu
    lippu+N+Sg+Gen: liipu
    lippu+N+Sg+Acc: liipu
    lippu+N+Sg+Ill: liipun
    lippu+N+Sg+Loc: liipust
    lippu+N+Sg+Com: lippuin
    lippu+N+Pl+Abe: liputtáá
    lippu+N+Ess:    lippun
    lippu+N+Par:    lippud
    lippu+N+Pl+Nom: liipuh
    lippu+N+Pl+Gen: liipui
    lippu+N+Pl+Acc: liipuid
    lippu+N+Pl+Ill: lippuid
    lippu+N+Pl+Loc: liipuin
    lippu+N+Pl+Com: lipuiguin
    lippu+N+Pl+Abe: lipuittáá

  Noun - tiätu: # u-stems
    tiätu+N+Sg+Nom: tiätu
    tiätu+N+Sg+Gen: tiäđu
    tiätu+N+Sg+Acc: tiäđu
    tiätu+N+Sg+Ill: tiätun
    tiätu+N+Sg+Loc: tiäđust
    tiätu+N+Sg+Com: tiäđoin
    tiätu+N+Pl+Abe: tiäđuttáá
    tiätu+N+Ess:    tiättun
    tiätu+N+Par:    tiättud
    tiätu+N+Pl+Nom: tiäđuh
    tiätu+N+Pl+Gen: tiäđui
    tiätu+N+Pl+Acc: tiäđuid
    tiätu+N+Pl+Ill: tiäđoid
    tiätu+N+Pl+Loc: tiäđuin
    tiätu+N+Pl+Com: tiäđuiguin
    tiätu+N+Pl+Abe: tiäđuittáá
